Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB414.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 17.169 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this section and KRS 17.170 and 17.175[, the following definitions shall
apply]:
(1) "DNA sample" or "deoxyribonucleic acid sample" means a biological sample[blood
or swab specimen] from a person, as prescribed by administrative regulation, that is
required to provide a DNA sample pursuant to KRS 17.170 or 17.510, that shall be
submitted to the Department of Kentucky State Police forensic laboratory for law
enforcement identification purposes and inclusion in law enforcement identification
databases;[ and]
(2) "Authorized personnel" means an agent of state or local government who is
properly trained in DNA sample collection pursuant to administrative regulation;
and
(3) "Rapid DNA instruments" means instrumentation that carries out a fully
automated process to derive a DNA analysis from a DNA sample.
Section 2. KRS 17.170 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any DNA sample collected pursuant to the law in effect prior to March 27, 2009,
shall be maintained and used pursuant to this section and KRS 17.175 and 17.510.
(2) The following persons shall have a DNA sample collected by authorized personnel:
(a) Any person convicted on or after March 27, 2009, of a felony offense under
the Kentucky Revised Statutes;[ or]
(b) Any juvenile who was at least fourteen (14) years of age at the time of the
commission of the offense and who stands adjudicated delinquent of being a
public offender by a court of competent jurisdiction, of:
1. Any felony offense in KRS Chapter 510;
2. Incest as defined in KRS 530.020;
Page 1 of 9
XXXX 1/14/2026 11:23 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1663
3. Criminal attempt or criminal conspiracy to commit an offense identified
in subparagraph 1. or 2. of this paragraph; or
4. Being a juvenile sexual offender under KRS 635.510; or
(c) Any adult arrested or indicted for, or otherwise charged with, any offense
classified as a felony offense in the Kentucky Revised Statutes after the
effective date of this Act.
(3) (a) An arresting peace officer who takes any person arrested for a felony
offense directly before a judge without booking the person into a jail shall
have a DNA sample collected from the person by authorized personnel and
shall submit that sample to the Department of Kentucky State Police
forensic laboratory.
(b) The jailer or other local correctional official into whose custody a person
arrested for a felony offense is committed shall have a DNA sample
collected from the person by authorized personnel as part of the person's
booking process and shall submit that sample to the Department of
Kentucky State Police forensic laboratory.
(c) If a person making his or her initial court appearance before a judge
pursuant to an arrest, indictment, summons, or other process for the charge
of a felony offense has not previously had a sample of his or her DNA
collected pursuant to this subsection, the sheriff shall have a DNA sample
collected from the person by authorized personnel as part of that person's
initial appearance. The sheriff shall submit the DNA samples collected to
the Department of Kentucky State Police forensic laboratory. The judge
before whom the person is appearing shall issue any orders necessary to
effectuate the requirements of this paragraph.
(d) It shall not be necessary to collect a DNA sample from a person under this
section if the person charged with collecting the sample verifies through a
Page 2 of 9
XXXX 1/14/2026 11:23 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1663
mechanism approved by the Department of Kentucky State Police forensic
laboratory both the identity of the charged person and that the person has
previously submitted a DNA sample that remains on file.
(e) A DNA sample may be collected by authorized personnel at any point
during the pendency of a charge for a felony offense made after the
effective date of this Act if a DNA sample was not previously collected
pursuant to this section, or if a previously collected DNA sample was lost,
damaged, destroyed, contaminated, or was otherwise unusable.
(f) 1. Authorized personnel may collect a second DNA sample to be
processed utilizing rapid DNA instruments from a person arrested or
indicted for, or otherwise charged with, a felony offense.
2. The second DNA sample shall be destroyed after processing, and
resulting profiles shall be stored and searched only in the state DNA
database.
3. The cabinet shall promulgate regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to establish standards for the operation of rapid DNA
instruments by local governments.
(4) Any person who is required to register as a sex offender under KRS 17.510 who is
not otherwise required to submit to a DNA sample collection under this section or
KRS 17.510, including those persons convicted of a felony or adjudicated as a
public offender on offenses in other jurisdictions as identified in KRS 17.510(6)
and (7), shall have a DNA sample collected by authorized personnel.
(5)[(4)] Any person who is required to provide a DNA sample pursuant to subsection
(2) of this section and who is released from custody upon sentencing or
adjudication shall immediately report to the local probation and parole office and
shall have a DNA sample collected by authorized personnel.
(6)[(5)] A DNA sample shall be obtained in an approved manner by authorized
Page 3 of 9
XXXX 1/14/2026 11:23 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1663
personnel[, a physician, registered nurse, phlebotomist, medical technician, or
medical technologist,] and packaged with supplies and containers provided by the
Department of Kentucky State Police forensic laboratory in accordance with
administrative regulations promulgated by the cabinet in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A. [No ]Civil liability shall not attach to any person authorized to obtain
the DNA sample as provided by this section as a result of the act of obtaining the
DNA sample from any person if[, provided] the procedure was done according to
administrative regulations by the cabinet.
(7)[(6)] Authorized personnel collecting DNA samples under this section or KRS
17.510 are not engaging in the practice of medicine pursuant to KRS 311.550.
(8)[(7)] Any person required to provide a DNA sample under this section or KRS
17.510 who, after receiving notice of the requirement to provide a DNA sample,
knowingly refuses to provide such DNA sample, shall be guilty of a Class A
misdemeanor for each separate violation of the offense.
(9)[(8)] Any person who tampers or attempts to tamper with any DNA sample
collected under this section or its container without lawful authority shall be guilty
of a Class D felony.
(10) A DNA sample obtained in good faith shall be deemed to have been obtained in
accordance with the requirements of this section, and the legitimate use of the
information derived from the DNA sample in furtherance of a criminal
investigation is authorized until the person from whom the DNA sample was
obtained is granted an expungement as provided in Section 3 of this Act.
Section 3. KRS 17.175 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A centralized database of DNA (deoxyribonucleic acid) identification records for
convicted or adjudicated offenders, adults arrested for, indicted for, or charged
with a felony offense, crime scene specimens, unidentified human remains, missing
persons, and close biological relatives of missing persons shall be established in the
Page 4 of 9
XXXX 1/14/2026 11:23 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1663
Department of Kentucky State Police under the direction, control, and supervision
of the Department of Kentucky State Police forensic laboratory. The established
system shall be compatible with the procedures set forth in a national DNA
identification index to ensure data exchange on a national level.
(2) The purpose of the centralized DNA database is to assist federal, state, and local
criminal justice and law enforcement agencies within and outside the
Commonwealth in the identification, detection, or exclusion of individuals who are
subjects of the investigation or prosecution of sex-related crimes, violent crimes, or
other crimes, and the identification and location of missing and unidentified
persons. Analysis of DNA samples obtained pursuant to this chapter is not
authorized for identification of any medical or genetic disorder.
(3) (a) The Department of Kentucky State Police forensic laboratory shall receive,
analyze, and classify DNA samples received from the Department of
Corrections, the Department of Juvenile Justice, and other sources, and shall
file the DNA results in the centralized databases for law enforcement
identification and statistical purposes. The department shall analyze and
classify all sexual assault evidence collection kits it receives. In cases where a
suspect has been identified, the department may give priority to analysis and
classification of sexual assault evidence collection kits where the reference
standard for comparison is provided with the kit. Except as provided in
paragraph (e) of this subsection, [by July 1, 2018, the average completion rate
for this analysis and classification shall not exceed ninety (90) days, and by
July 1, 2020, ]the average completion rate for this analysis and classification
shall not exceed sixty (60) days.
(b) Failure to meet the completion time goals established in paragraph (a) of this
subsection shall not be a basis for a dismissal of a criminal action or a bar to
the admissibility of evidence.
Page 5 of 9
XXXX 1/14/2026 11:23 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1663
(c) The Department of Kentucky State Police shall, by August 1 of each year,
report to the Legislative Research Commission the yearly average completion
rate for the immediately preceding five (5) fiscal years.
(d) With approval by the secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet in
situations in which an equipment casualty necessitates the expedited
acquisition or repair of laboratory equipment required for the analysis of
evidence, the acquisition or repair shall be exempt from the Finance and
Administration Cabinet's competitive bidding process for both acquisition and
repair purposes. Each time the authority granted by this paragraph is used, the
equipment acquisition or repair shall be fully documented within thirty (30)
days by the agency head in a written or electronic letter to the secretary of the
Finance and Administration Cabinet, attached to an ordering or payment
document in the state's procurement system, which shall include:
1. An explanation of the equipment acquired or repaired;
2. The name of the vendor selected;
3. The amount of procurement;
4. Other price quotations obtained; and
5. The basis for selection of the vendor.
(e) To the extent appropriated funds are insufficient to meet the average
completion time goals established in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the
Department of Kentucky State Police forensic laboratory shall no longer be
required to meet the average completion time goals.
(4) DNA identification records produced from the samples are not public records but
shall be confidential and used only for law enforcement purposes. DNA
identification records shall be exempt from [the provisions of ]KRS 61.870 to
61.884.
(5) DNA identification records produced from evidence collected as a result of an
Page 6 of 9
XXXX 1/14/2026 11:23 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1663
examination performed under KRS 216B.400 that are voluntarily submitted solely
for elimination purposes shall not be checked against or included in the centralized
database created pursuant to this section or any other database.
(6) A person whose DNA profile has been included in the data bank pursuant to this
chapter may apply to the Department of Kentucky State Police for removal and
destruction of the DNA record and DNA sample if the arrest or conviction that
led to the taking of the DNA sample or inclusion of the DNA record resulted in
an acquittal, a dismissal, a nolle prosequi, a conviction for a nonfelony offense,
[request expungement on the grounds that the conviction or adjudication on which
the authority for including the DNA profile was based has been reversed and the
case dismissed], or if[that] the person successfully completed the pretrial diversion
program under KRS 533.258 and the charges were dismissed-diverted. The
Department of Kentucky State Police shall expunge all identifiable information in
the data bank pertaining to the person and destroy all samples from the person upon
receiving a valid expungement request accompanied by any verifying
documentation the department shall require by administrative regulation[receipt
of:
(a) A written request for expungement pursuant to this section; and
(b) Either:
1. A certified copy of the court order reversing and dismissing the
conviction or adjudication; or
2. A certified copy of the court order deeming the charges dismissed-
diverted].
(7) The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A necessary to carry out the provisions of the DNA database
identification system to include procedures for collection of DNA samples and the
database system usage and integrity.
Page 7 of 9
XXXX 1/14/2026 11:23 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1663
(8) The Department of Kentucky State Police shall destroy all DNA samples that are
not entered into the DNA database identification system.
(9) Any person who disseminates, receives, or otherwise uses or attempts to use
information in the DNA database identification system, knowing that the[such]
dissemination, receipt, or use is for a purpose other than authorized by this section,
shall be guilty of a Class D felony.
Section 4. KRS 64.060 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Sheriffs, jailers, constables granted peace officer powers, coroners, marshals, and
police officers[policemen] shall be paid out of the State Treasury for the following
services the following fees:
(a) Apprehending a person on charge of felony, or a fugitive
from justice charged with a felony in this state ........................................$10.00
(b) Executing a process of contempt in a criminal
case when the court excuses the contempt ................................................$1.60
(c) Executing a summons upon a witness in behalf
of the Commonwealth in a felony case ......................................................$3.00
(d) Summoning a jury, on order of a court, in a county other than that in which
the action is pending, a reasonable allowance to be fixed by the court.
(e) Summoning and attending a jury in a case of felony ................................$2.50
(f) For each DNA sample collected and transmitted to the Department of
Kentucky State Police in accordance with Section 2 of this Act that results
in a usable DNA profile, that is not received in duplicate, and is not deemed
unacceptable due to a collection error ......................................................$5.00
(2) A[No] claim for services incidental to examining courts shall not be allowed to any
sheriff, deputy sheriff, constable, marshal, police officer[policeman], or other
officer authorized to execute process in felony cases until the grand jury has
returned an indictment for a felony.
Page 8 of 9
XXXX 1/14/2026 11:23 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1663
(3) Constables and deputy constables authorized to exercise the powers of a peace
officer under KRS 70.325(2) shall be entitled to the fees provided under subsection
(1) of this section and shall be subject to the requirements of subsection (2) of this
section.
Page 9 of 9
XXXX 1/14/2026 11:23 AM Jacketed